California statutes. Vehicle Code
(f) The deposit of fines and bails in the county treasury as described in subdivision (e) is limited to the amnesty program described in this section, and it is the intent of the Legislature that it shall not be considered a precedent with respect to affecting programs that receive funding pursuant to Section 1463 of the Penal Code.

(g) Each county participating in the program shall file, not later than six months after the termination of the program, a written report with the Assembly Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Committee on Judiciary. The report shall summarize the amount of money collected, operating costs of the program, distribution of funds collected, and when possible, how the funds were expended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

42008.7.

(a) The State of California continues to face a fiscal and economic crisis affecting the State Budget and the overall state economy. In light of this crisis, a one-time infraction amnesty program would do the following:

(1) Provide relief to individuals who have found themselves in violation of a court-ordered obligation because they are financially unable to pay traffic bail or fines.

(2) Provide increased revenue at a time when revenue is scarce by encouraging payment of old fines that have remained unpaid.

(3) Allow courts and counties to resolve older delinquent cases and focus limited
 resources on collecting on more recent cases.

(b) A one-time amnesty program for fines and bail meeting the eligibility requirements set forth in subdivision (e) shall be established in each county. Unless agreed otherwise by the court and the county in writing, the government entities that are responsible for the collection of delinquent court-ordered debt shall be responsible for implementation of the amnesty program as to that debt, maintaining the same division of responsibility in place with respect to the collection of court-ordered debt under subdivision (b) of Section 1463.010 of the Penal Code.

(c) As used in this section, the term “fine” or “bail” refers to the total amounts due in connection with a specific violation, which include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Base fine or bail, as
 established by court order, by statute, or by the court’s bail schedule.

(2) Penalty assessments imposed pursuant to Section 1464 of the Penal Code and Sections 70372, 76000, 76000.5, 76104.6, and 76104.7 of the Government Code.

(3) Civil assessment imposed pursuant to Section 1214.1 of the Penal Code.

(4) State surcharge imposed pursuant to Section 1465.7 of the Penal Code.

(5) Court security fee imposed pursuant to Section 1465.8 of the Penal Code.

(d) In addition to and at the same time as the mandatory one-time amnesty program is established pursuant to subdivision (b), the court and the county may jointly agree to extend that amnesty program to fines and bail imposed for a misdemeanor
 violation of this code and a violation of Section 853.7 of the Penal Code added to the misdemeanor case otherwise subject to the amnesty. The amnesty program authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall not apply to parking violations and violations of Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153 of this code.

(e) Violations are only eligible for amnesty if paragraph (1), (2), or (3) applies and the requirements of paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) are met:

(1) The violation is an infraction violation filed with the court.

(2) It is a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 40508, or a violation of Section 853.7 of the Penal Code added to the case subject to paragraph (1).

(3) The violation is a misdemeanor violation filed with the court to which
 subdivision (d) applies.

(4) The due date for payment of the fine or bail was on or before January 1, 2009.

(5) The defendant does not owe victim restitution on any case within the county.

(6) There are no outstanding misdemeanor or felony warrants for the defendant within the county, except for misdemeanor warrants for misdemeanor violations authorized by the court and the county pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) Each amnesty program shall accept, in full satisfaction of any eligible fine or bail, 50 percent of the fine or bail amount, as defined in subdivision (c) of this section. Payment of a fine or bail under an amnesty program implemented pursuant to this section shall be accepted beginning January 1, 2012, and ending June 30, 2012. The Judicial
 Council shall adopt guidelines for the amnesty program no later than November 1, 2011, and each program shall be conducted in accordance with Judicial Council guidelines.

(g) No criminal action shall be brought against a person for a delinquent fine or bail paid under the amnesty program.

(h) The total amount of funds collected under the amnesty program shall as soon as practical after receipt thereof be deposited in the county treasury or the account established under Section 77009 of the Government Code. Any unreimbursed costs of operating the amnesty program, excluding capital expenditures, may be deducted from the revenues collected under the amnesty program by the court or the county that incurred the expense of operating the program. Notwithstanding Section 1203.1d of the Penal Code, the remaining revenues collected under the amnesty program shall be distributed on a pro
 rata basis in the same manner as a partial payment distributed pursuant to Section 1462.5 of the Penal Code.

(i) Each court or county implementing an amnesty program shall file, not later than September 30, 2012, a written report with the Judicial Council, on a form approved by the Judicial Council. The report shall include information about the number of cases resolved, the amount of money collected, and the operating costs of the amnesty program. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before December 31, 2012, the Judicial Council shall submit a report to the Legislature summarizing the information provided by each court or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   (AB 1358)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42008.8.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a one-time infraction amnesty program would do all of the following:

(1) Provide relief to individuals who have found themselves in violation of a court-ordered obligation because they have unpaid traffic bail or fines.

(2) Provide relief to individuals who have found themselves in violation of a court-ordered obligation or who have had their driving privileges suspended pursuant to Section 13365.

(3) Provide increased revenue at a time when revenue is scarce by encouraging payment of old fines that have remained unpaid.

(4) Allow courts and counties to resolve older delinquent cases and focus limited resources on collections for more recent cases.

(b) A one-time amnesty program for unpaid fines and bail meeting the eligibility requirements set forth in subdivision (g) shall be established in each county. Unless agreed otherwise by the court and the county in writing, the government entities that are responsible for the collection of delinquent court-ordered debt shall be responsible for implementation of the amnesty program as to that debt, maintaining the same division of responsibility in place with respect to the collection of court-ordered debt under subdivision (b) of Section 1463.010 of the Penal Code.

(c) As used in this section, the term “fine” or “bail” refers to the total amounts due in connection with a specific violation,
 including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Base fine or bail, as established by court order, by statute, or by the court’s bail schedule.

(2) Penalty assessments imposed pursuant to Section 1464 of the Penal Code, and Sections 70372, 76000, 76000.5, 76104.6, and 76104.7 of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 76000.10 of, the Government Code, and Section 42006 of this code.

(3) State surcharges imposed pursuant to Section 1465.7 of the Penal Code.

(4) Court operations assessments imposed pursuant to Section 1465.8 of the Penal Code.

(5) Criminal conviction assessments pursuant to Section 70373 of the Government Code.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), any civil assessment imposed pursuant to Section 1214.1 of the Penal Code shall not be collected, nor shall the payment of that assessment be a requirement of participation in the amnesty program.

(e) Concurrent with the amnesty program established pursuant to subdivision (b), between October 1, 2015, to March 31, 2017, inclusive, the following shall apply:

(1) The court shall, within 90 days, issue and file the appropriate certificate pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 40509 for any participant of the one-time amnesty program established pursuant to subdivision (b) demonstrating that the participant has appeared in court, paid the fine, or otherwise satisfied the court, if the driving privilege of that participant was suspended pursuant to Section 13365 in connection with
 a specific violation described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (g). For applications submitted prior to January 1, 2017, that remain outstanding as of that date, the court shall issue and file the certificate no later than March 31, 2017. For applications submitted on or before March 31, 2017, all terms and procedures related to the participant’s payment plans shall remain in effect after March 31, 2017.

(2) The court shall, within 90 days, issue and file with the department the appropriate certificate pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 40509 for any person in good standing in a comprehensive collection program pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1463.007 of the Penal Code demonstrating that the person has appeared in court, paid the fine, or otherwise satisfied the court, if the driving privilege was suspended pursuant to Section 13365 in connection with a specific violation described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3)
 of subdivision (g). For applications submitted prior to January 1, 2017, that remain outstanding as of that date, the court shall issue and file the certificate no later than March 31, 2017. For applications submitted on or before March 31, 2017, all terms and procedures related to the participant’s payment plans shall remain in effect after March 31, 2017.

(3) Any person who is eligible for a driver’s license pursuant to Section 12801, 12801.5, or 12801.9 shall be eligible for the amnesty program established pursuant to subdivision (b) for any specific violation described in subdivision (g). The department shall issue a driver’s license to any person who is eligible pursuant to Section 12801, 12801.5, or 12801.9 if the person is participating in the amnesty program and is otherwise eligible for the driver’s license but for the fines or bail to be collected through the program.

(4) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not deny reinstating the driving privilege of any person who participates in the amnesty program established pursuant to subdivision (b) for any fines or bail in connection with the specific violation that is the basis for participation in the amnesty program.

(f) In addition to, and at the same time as, the mandatory one-time amnesty program is established pursuant to subdivision (b), the court and the county may jointly agree to extend that amnesty program to fines and bail imposed for a misdemeanor violation of this code and a violation of Section 853.7 of the Penal Code that was added to the misdemeanor case otherwise subject to the amnesty. The amnesty program authorized pursuant to this subdivision shall not apply to parking violations and violations of Sections 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, and 23153.

(g) A violation is
 only eligible for amnesty if paragraph (1), (2), or (3) applies, and the requirements of paragraphs (4) to (8), inclusive, are met:

(1) The violation is an infraction violation filed with the court.

(2) It is a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 40508, or a violation of Section 853.7 of the Penal Code that was added to the case subject to paragraph (1).

(3) The violation is a misdemeanor violation filed with the court to which subdivision (f) applies.

(4) The initial due date for payment of the fine or bail was on or before January 1, 2013.

(5) There are no outstanding misdemeanor or felony warrants for the defendant within the county, except for misdemeanor warrants for
 misdemeanor violations subject to this section.

(6) The person does not owe victim restitution on any case within the county.

(7) The person has not made any payments for the violation after September 30, 2015, to a comprehensive collection program in the county pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1463.007 of the Penal Code.

(8) The person filed a request with the court on or before March 31, 2017.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), each amnesty program shall accept, in full satisfaction of any eligible fine or bail, 50 percent of the fine or bail amount, as defined in subdivision (c).

(2) If the participant certifies under penalty of perjury that he or
 she receives any of the public benefits listed in subdivision (a) of Section 68632 of the Government Code or is within the conditions described in subdivision (b) of Section 68632 of the Government Code, the amnesty program shall accept, in full satisfaction of any eligible fine or bail, 20 percent of the fine or bail amount, as defined in subdivision (c).

(i) The Judicial Council, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, shall adopt guidelines for the amnesty program no later than October 1, 2015, and each program shall be conducted in accordance with the Judicial Council’s guidelines. As part of its guidelines, the Judicial Council shall include all of the following:

(1) Each court or county responsible for implementation of the amnesty program pursuant to subdivision (b) shall recover costs pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1463.007 of the Penal
 Code and may charge an amnesty program fee of fifty dollars ($50) that may be collected with the receipt of the first payment of a participant.

(2) A payment plan option created pursuant to Judicial Council guidelines in which a monthly payment is equal to the amount that an eligible participant can afford to pay per month consistent with Sections 68633 and 68634 of the Government Code. If a participant chooses the payment plan option, the county or court shall collect all relevant information to allow for collection by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to existing protocols prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board to collect delinquent debts of any amount in which a participant is delinquent or otherwise in default under his or her amnesty payment plan.

(3) If a participant does not comply with the terms of his or her payment plan under the amnesty program, including failing to make
 one or more payments, the appropriate agency shall send a notice to the participant that he or she has failed to make one or more payments and that the participant has 30 days to either resume making payments or to request that the agency change the payment amount. If the participant fails to respond to the notice within 30 days, the appropriate agency may refer the participant to the Franchise Tax Board for collection of any remaining balance owed, including an amount equal to the reasonable administrative costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board to collect the delinquent amount owed. The Franchise Tax Board shall collect any delinquent amounts owed pursuant to existing protocols prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. The comprehensive collection program may also utilize additional collection efforts pursuant to Section 1463.007 of the Penal Code, except for subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of that section.

(4) A plan for
 outreach that will, at a minimum, make available via an Internet Web site relevant information regarding the amnesty program, including how an individual may participate in the amnesty program.

(5) The Judicial Council shall reimburse costs incurred by the Department of Motor Vehicles up to an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), including all of the following:

(A) Providing on a separate insert with each motor vehicle registration renewal notice a summary of the amnesty program established pursuant to this section that is compliant with Section 7292 of the Government Code.

(B) Posting on the department’s Internet Web site information regarding the amnesty program.

(C) Personnel costs associated with the amnesty
 program.

(j) The Judicial Council, in consultation with the department, may, within its existing resources, consider, adopt, or develop recommendations for an appropriate mechanism or mechanisms to allow reinstatement of the driving privilege of any person who otherwise meets the criteria for amnesty but who has violations in more than one county.

(k) A criminal action shall not be brought against a person for a delinquent fine or bail paid under the amnesty program.

(l) (1) The total amount of funds collected under the amnesty program shall, as soon as practical after receipt thereof, be deposited in the county treasury or the account established under Section 77009 of the Government Code. After acceptance of the amount specified in subdivision (h), notwithstanding Section 1203.1d of the Penal
 Code, the remaining revenues collected under the amnesty program shall be distributed on a pro rata basis in the same manner as a partial payment distributed pursuant to Section 1462.5 of the Penal Code.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 1464 of the Penal Code, the amount of funds collected pursuant to this section that would be available for distribution pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1464 of the Penal Code shall instead be distributed as follows:

(A) The first two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) received shall be transferred to the Judicial Council.

(B) Following the transfer of the funds described in subparagraph (A), once a month, both of the following transfers shall occur:

(i) An amount equal to 82.20 percent of the amount of funds
 collected pursuant to this section during the preceding month shall be transferred into the Peace Officers’ Training Fund.

(ii) An amount equal to 17.80 percent of the amount of funds collected pursuant to this section during the preceding month shall be transferred into the Corrections Training Fund.

(m) Each court or county implementing an amnesty program shall file, not later than May 31, 2017, a written report with the Judicial Council, on a form approved by the Judicial Council. The report shall include information about the number of cases resolved, the amount of money collected, and the operating costs of the amnesty program. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before August 31, 2017, the Judicial Council shall submit a report to the Legislature summarizing the information provided by each court or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 779, Sec. 1.   (SB 881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

42009.

(a) For an offense specified in subdivision (b), committed by the driver of a vehicle within a highway construction or maintenance area, during any time when traffic is regulated or restricted through or around that area pursuant to Section 21367, or when the highway construction or maintenance is actually being performed in the area by workers acting in their official capacity, the fine, in a misdemeanor case, shall be double the amount otherwise prescribed. In an infraction case, the fine shall be one category higher than the penalty otherwise prescribed by the uniform traffic penalty schedule established pursuant to Section 40310.

(b) A violation of the following is an offense that is subject to subdivision (a):

(1) Section 21367, relating to regulation of traffic at a construction site.

(2) Article 3 (commencing with Section 21450) of Chapter 2 of Division 11, relating to obedience to traffic devices.

(3) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21650) of Division 11, relating to driving, overtaking, and passing.

(4) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 21800) of Division 11, relating to yielding the right-of-way.

(5) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 22100) of Division 11, relating to turning and stopping and turn signals.

(6) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 22348) of Division 11, relating to speed limits.

(7) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22450) of Division 11, relating to special traffic stops.

(8) Section 23103, relating to reckless driving.

(9) Section 23104 or 23105, relating to reckless driving which results in bodily injury to another.

(10) Section 23109 or 23109.1, relating to speed contests.

(11) Section 23152, relating to driving under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance, or a violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, relating to alcohol-related reckless driving.

(12) Section 23153, relating to driving under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance, which results in bodily injury to another.

(13) Section 23154, relating to convicted drunk drivers operating a motor vehicle with a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater.

(14) Section 23220, relating to drinking while driving.

(15) Section 23221, relating to drinking in a motor vehicle while on the highway.

(16) Section 23222, relating to driving while possessing an open alcoholic beverage container.

(17) Section 23223, relating to being in a vehicle on the highway while possessing an open alcoholic beverage container.

(18) Section 23224, relating to being a driver or passenger under the age of 21 possessing an open alcoholic beverage container.

(19) Section 23225, relating to being the owner or driver of a vehicle in which there is an open alcoholic beverage container.

(20) Section 23226, relating to being a passenger in a vehicle in which there is an open alcoholic beverage container.

(c) This section applies only when construction or maintenance work is actually being performed by workers, and there are work zone traffic control devices, traffic controls or warning signs, or any combination of those, to notify motorists and pedestrians of construction or maintenance workers in the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 749, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative January 1, 2009, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 749.)
-------------------------------------------

42010.

(a) For an offense specified in subdivision (b) that is committed by the driver of a vehicle within an area that has been designated as a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone pursuant to Section 97 and following of the Streets and Highways Code, the fine, in a misdemeanor case, shall be double the amount otherwise prescribed, and, in an infraction case, the fine shall be one category higher than the penalty otherwise prescribed by the uniform traffic penalty schedule established pursuant to Section 40310.

(b) A violation of the following is an offense that is subject to subdivision (a):

(1) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21650) of Division 11, relating to driving, overtaking, and passing.

(2) Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 22348) of Division 11, relating to speed limits.

(3) Section 23103, relating to reckless driving.

(4) Section 23104 or 23105, relating to reckless driving that results in bodily injury to another.

(5) Section 23109 or 23109.1, relating to speed contests.

(6) Section 23152, relating to driving under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance, or a violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, relating to alcohol-related reckless driving.

(7) Section 23153, relating to driving under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance, which results in bodily injury to another.

(8) Section 23154, relating to convicted drunk drivers operating a motor vehicle with a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater.

(9) Section 23220, relating to drinking while driving.

(10) Section 23221, relating to drinking in a motor vehicle while on the highway.

(11) Section 23222, relating to driving while possessing an open alcoholic beverage container.

(12) Section 23223, relating to being in a vehicle on the highway while possessing an open alcoholic beverage container.

(13) Section 23224, relating to being a driver or passenger under 21 years of age possessing an open alcoholic beverage container.

(14) Section 23225, relating to being the owner or driver of a vehicle in which there is an open alcoholic beverage container.

(15) Section 23226, relating to being a passenger in a vehicle in which there is an open alcoholic beverage container.

(c) This section applies only when traffic controls or warning signs have been placed pursuant to Section 97 or 97.1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the enhanced fine imposed pursuant to this section shall be based only on the base fine imposed for the underlying offense and shall not include any other enhancements imposed pursuant to law.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any additional penalty, forfeiture, or assessment imposed by any other statute shall be based on the amount of the base fine before enhancement or doubling and shall not be based on the amount of the enhanced fine imposed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 749, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative January 1, 2009, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 749.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Weight Violations [42030. - 42032.]

42030.

(a) Every person convicted of a violation of any weight limitation provision of Division 15 (commencing with Section 35000), and every person convicted of a violation of Section 21461 with respect to signs provided pursuant to Section 35654 or 35752, and every person convicted of a violation of Section 40001 for requiring the operation of a vehicle upon a highway in violation of any provision referred to in this section shall be punished by a fine which equals the amounts specified in the following table: Pounds of excess weightFine 0– 1,000 $ 20 1,001– 1,500 30 1,501– 2,000 40 2,001– 2,500 55 2,501– 3,000 85 3,001– 3,500 105 3,501– 4,000 125 4,001– 4,500 145 4,501– 5,000 175 5,001– 6,000 .04 each lb. 6,001– 7,000 .06 each lb. 7,001– 8,000 .08 each lb. 8,001–10,000 .15 each lb.10,001 and over .20 each
 lb.(b) No part of the penalties prescribed by this section shall be suspended for a conviction of any of the following:

(1) Section 40001 for requiring operation of a vehicle upon a highway in violation of any provision referred to in this section.

(2) Any provision referred to in this section when the amount of the weight exceeds 4,000 pounds.

(3) Any provision referred to in this section when a second or subsequent conviction of a violation thereof occurs within three years immediately preceding the violation charged.

(c) However, notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the court shall exercise discretion with respect to
 the imposition of the fine under this section for excess weight not exceeding 1,000 pounds if the load of the vehicle cited consisted entirely of field-loaded, unprocessed bulk agricultural or forest products or livestock being transported from the field to the first point of processing or handling.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the court may exercise discretion with respect to the imposition of the fine under this section if any applicable local permit was obtained prior to the court hearing and, at the time of issuance of the notice to appear, the motor carrier was transporting construction equipment or materials and a valid extra-legal load permit from the Department of Transportation was in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42030.1.

(a) Every person convicted of a violation of any declared gross vehicle weight limitation provision of this code, shall be punished by a fine that equals the amounts specified in the following table: Pounds in Excess of the Declared
 Gross Vehicle WeightFine 1,001–1,500 $ 250 1,501–2,000 300 2,001–2,500 350 2,501–3,000 400 3,001–3,500 450 3,501–4,000 500 4,001–4,500 550 4,501–5,000 600 5,001–6,000 700 6,001–7,000 800 7,001–8,000 900 8,001–10,000 1,00010,001 and over 2,000(b) No part of the penalties prescribed by this section shall be suspended for a conviction of any of the following:

(1) Section 40001 for requiring operation of a vehicle upon a highway in violation of any provision referred to in this section.

(2) Any provision referred to in this section when a second or subsequent conviction of a violation thereof occurs within three years immediately preceding the violation charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 58.   Effective September 29, 2000.   Operative December 31, 2001, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 861.)
-------------------------------------------

42031.

Whenever the gross weight and any axle or wheel weight of a vehicle are in excess of the limits prescribed in this code, the excess weights shall be deemed one offense in violation of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

42032.

(a) In addition to any other fines and penalties, any local public agency which owns or operates vehicles used for the collection of garbage, refuse, or rubbish and which has, within any 90-day period, been convicted an excessive number of times for operating those vehicles in violation of any of the weight limitations set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 35550) of Division 15, taking into consideration the total number of trip routes for those vehicles which are normally scheduled in the same 90-day period, may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation. Nothing in
 this section affects the legal standards, proof requirements, or penalty provisions of any other provision of the law.

(b) The penalties imposed by this section shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney. Prior to undertaking a civil action, a reasonable effort for informal resolution of the problem of excessive violations shall be made by the applicable attorney. Penalties recovered shall be paid to the Treasurer for deposit in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund and used, upon appropriation, for purposes of highway maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Disposition of Fees, Fines, and Forfeitures [42200. - 42240.]



  ARTICLE 1. Fines and Forfeitures [42200. - 42205.]

42200.

(a) Of the total amount of fines and forfeitures received by a city under Section 1463 of the Penal Code that proportion which is represented by fines and forfeitures collected from any person charged with a misdemeanor under this code following arrest by an officer employed by a city, shall be paid into the treasury of the city and deposited in a special fund to be known as the “Traffic Safety Fund,” and shall be used exclusively for official traffic control devices, the maintenance thereof, equipment and supplies for traffic law enforcement and traffic accident prevention, and for the maintenance, improvement, or construction of public streets, bridges, and culverts within the city, but the fund shall not be used to pay the compensation of traffic or other police officers. The fund may be used to pay the compensation of school crossing guards who are not regular full-time members of the police department of the city.

(b) For purposes of this section, “city” includes any city, city and county, district, including any enterprise special district, community service district, or county service area engaged in police protection activities as reported to the Controller for inclusion in the 1989–90 edition of the Financial Transactions Report Concerning Special Districts under the heading of Police Protection and Public Safety, authority, or other local agency (other than a county) which employs persons authorized to make arrests or to issue notices to appear or notices of violation which may be filed in court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

42201.

(a) Of the total amount of fines and forfeitures received by a county under Section 1463.001 of the Penal Code, fines and forfeitures collected from any person charged with a misdemeanor under this code following arrest by any officer employed by the state or by the county shall be paid into the general fund of the county. However, the board of supervisors of the county may, by resolution, provide that a portion thereof be transferred into the road fund of the county.

(b) The board of supervisors of a county may enter into a contract with the Department of the California Highway Patrol for the purpose of providing adequate protection for school pupils who are required to cross heavily traveled streets, highways, and roadways in the unincorporated areas of the county. When requested, the Department of the California Highway Patrol may provide such service and the county shall reimburse the state for salaries and wages of crossing guards furnished by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to such contract, including any necessary retirement and general administrative costs and expenses in connection therewith, and may pay the costs thereof from amounts deposited in the road fund pursuant to this section.

(c) Fines and forfeitures received by a county under Section 1463.001 of the Penal Code may be used to pay the compensation of school crossing guards and necessary equipment costs and administrative costs.

(d) When requested by any county which had in effect on June 30, 1979, a contract with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, to provide protection for school pupils at school crossings, the department upon request of a county shall continue to administer such school crossing program until June 30, 1980. The county shall reimburse the Department of the California Highway Patrol for general administrative costs and expenses in connection therewith, except that, effective January 1, 1980, the crossing guards shall be furnished to the California Highway Patrol and such crossing guards shall be employees of the county, the county superintendent of schools, the affected school districts, or both the superintendent and the affected school districts, at the option of the board of supervisors of the county. Any salaries and wages of crossing guards, including necessary retirement and equipment costs and any administrative costs shall be paid or reimbursed by the county from amounts deposited in the road fund pursuant to this section.

(e) The board of supervisors may adopt standards for the provision of school crossing guards. The board has final authority over the total cost of the school crossing guard program of any agency to be paid or reimbursed from amounts deposited in the road fund pursuant to this section. The board of supervisors may specify that a designated county officer, employee, or commissioner is to hire school crossing guards, or, in the alternative, the board may specify that any school district crossing guard program in unincorporated areas shall be maintained by the school districts desiring the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 308, Sec. 34.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42201.1.

Fines and forfeitures received by a county under Section 1463 of the Penal Code may be used to reimburse the state for the construction of platform scales and vehicle inspection facilities in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

42201.5.

Fines, forfeitures, and deposits of bail collected as a result of a charge or conviction of an infraction shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as fines, forfeitures, and deposits of bail collected from a person charged with or convicted of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

42201.6.

(a) A deposit of bail received with respect to an infraction violation of this code, or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code, including, but not limited to, a violation involving the standing or parking of a vehicle, shall be refunded by the agency which issued the notice of violation or the court within 30 days of a cancellation, dismissal, or finding of not guilty of the offense charged.

(b) Multiple or duplicate deposits of bail or parking penalty shall be identified by the court or agency and refunded within 30 days of identification.

(c) Any amount to be refunded in accordance with subdivision (a) or (b) shall accrue interest, at the rate specified in Section 3289 of the Civil Code, on and after the 60th day of a cancellation, dismissal, or finding of not guilty or identification of multiple or duplicate deposits, and shall be refunded as soon as possible thereafter along with accrued interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 290, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42202.

Failure, refusal, or neglect on the part of any judicial or other officer or employee receiving or having custody of any fine or forfeiture mentioned in this article either before or after deposit in the respective fund to comply with the foregoing provisions of this article is misconduct in office and ground for removal therefrom.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

42203.

Notwithstanding Section 42201 or 42201.5, 50 percent of all fines and forfeitures collected in a superior court upon conviction or upon the forfeiture of bail for violations of any provisions of the Vehicle Code, or of any local ordinance or resolution, relating to stopping, standing, or parking a vehicle, that have occurred upon the premises of facilities physically located in such county, but which are owned by another county, which other county furnishes law enforcement personnel for the premises, shall be transmitted pursuant to this section to the county which owns the facilities upon which the violations occurred. The court receiving such moneys shall, once each month, transmit such moneys received in the preceding month to the county treasurer of the county in which the court is located. Once each month in which the county treasurer receives such moneys, the county treasurer shall transmit to the county which owns such facilities an amount equal to 50 percent thereof. The county owning such facilities shall, upon receipt of such moneys from the superior court of the county in which the facilities are physically located, deposit such moneys in its county treasury for use solely in meeting traffic control and law enforcement expenses on the premises upon which the violations occurred.

This section shall not apply when the county in which such facilities are located performs all law enforcement functions with respect to such facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 608.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

42204.
